Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-301.1 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Contracting organization" means an organization which
operates under a written agreement signed between the Office of
Juvenile Affairs, Oklahoma Health Care Authority, or Department of
Human Services and an organization that provides direct care
workers, rather than full-time direct hire staff, to post-
HB3907 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

adju dication treatment facilities, residential care facilities
including intermediate care facilities for individuals with
intellectual disabilities (ICF-IID), daily living supports (DLS)
home or group homes;
2. "Temporary agency" means staffing agencies, part-time
staffing agencies, recruiting agencies, or other organizations that
provide employees on a temporary basis; and
3. "Vulnerable person" means any person under the age of
eighteen (18) or a person having an intellectual disability.
B. A group home, intermediate care facilities for individuals
with intellectual disabilities, daily living supports (DLS) home,
post-adjudication treatment facility, or any other facility holding
youth operated by the Office of Juvenile Affairs, Department of
Human Services, or contracted with the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority, may utilize, employ, or enter into an agreement to staff
facilities using organizations known as temporary agencies or
contracting organizations who employ full- or part-time team members
on behalf of the Office of Juvenile Affairs, Department of Human
Services, or the Oklahoma Health Care Authority on a temporary or
contract basis for no more than two (2) months for any single
position to be covered by a temporary staff member within a twelve-
month period and the agency utilizing the temporary staff member
shall be actively trying to fill the permanent position.

HB3907 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 458.1 of Title 19, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Contracting organization" means an organization which
operates under a written agreement signed between the Office of
Juvenile Affairs and an organization that provided contract workers,
rather than full-time direct hire staff, to post-adjudication
treatment facilities; and
2. "Temporary agency" means staffing agencies, part-time
staffing agencies, recruiting agencies, or other organizations that
provide employees on a temporary basis.
B. County juvenile detention centers may utilize, employ, or
enter into an agreement to staff detention facilities using
organizations known as temporary agencies or contracting
organizations who employ full- or part-time team members to the
county on a contract basis for no more than two (2) months for any
single position to be covered by a temporary staff member within a
twelve-month period and the agency utilizing the temporary staff
member shall be actively trying to fill the permanent position.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 530.9 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
HB3907 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. "Contracting organization" means an organization which
operates under a written agreement signed between the Office of
Juvenile Affairs and an organization that provided contract workers,
rather than full-time direct hire staff, to post-adjudication
treatment facilities; and
2. "Temporary agency" means staffing agencies, part-time
staffing agencies, recruiting agencies, or other organizations that
provide employees on a temporary basis.
B. An adult companion home certified by the Department of Human
Services may utilize, employ, or enter into an agreement to staff
facilities using organizations known as temporary agencies or
contracting organizations who employ full- or part-time team members
to the Department on a contract basis for no more than two (2)
months for any single position to be covered by a temporary staff
member within a twelve-month period and the agency utilizing the
temporary staff member shall be actively trying to fill the
permanent position.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended.




HB3907 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.